Florida, session 2026, SB920.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 28 29 Section 1.âParagraph (b) of subsection (10) of section 30 1003.4282, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 31 1003.4282âRequirements for a standard high school diploma.â 32 (10)âCAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION CREDIT.âThe Department 33 of Education shall convene a workgroup, no later than December 34 1, 2024, to: 35 (b)âEstablish three mathematics pathways for students 36 enrolled in secondary grades by aligning mathematics courses to 37 programs, postsecondary education, and careers. The workgroup 38 shall collaborate to identify the three mathematics pathways and 39 the mathematics course sequence within each pathway which align 40 to the mathematics skills needed for success in the 41 corresponding academic programs, postsecondary education, and 42 careers. 43 1.âThe mathematics pathways must incorporate the applied 44 algebra courses established under s. 1003.4936 which align the 45 Florida Standards for Algebra 1 with the career and technical 46 education standards and benchmarks for each designated career 47 cluster. 48 2.âEach mathematics pathway must include at least one 49 course sequence beginning with an applied algebra course aligned 50 to a specific career cluster. The workgroup shall identify 51 additional mathematics courses that follow each applied algebra 52 course and build on the algebraic reasoning, modeling, and 53 quantitative skills introduced through industry-relevant 54 applications. The mathematics pathways may include a plan to 55 create new mathematics courses to complete a pathway. 56 3.âEach mathematics pathway must offer flexibility and the 57 ability to move between pathways if necessary. 58 4.âMathematics pathways must create clear links between 59 precollege mathematics and college-level math pathways, and 60 support student progression into postsecondary academic 61 programs, state college career and technical education programs, 62 career center programs, industry certification programs, and 63 high-skill, high-wage occupations. 64 5.âThe mathematics pathways that incorporate applied 65 algebra courses created under s. 1003.4936(3)(a)1. must be 66 identified no later than September 1, 2027. The mathematics 67 pathways that incorporate applied algebra courses created under 68 s. 1003.4936(3)(a)2. must be identified no later than September 69 1, 2028. The workgroup shall submit identified mathematics 70 pathways to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the 71 Speaker of the House of Representatives. 72 Section 2.âSection 1003.4936, Florida Statutes, is created 73 to read: 74 1003.4936âApplied algebra for career and technical 75 education.â 76 (1)âThe Legislature finds that algebra is an important step 77 in a studentâs mathematics pathway. Algebra is a prerequisite 78 for higher level mathematics courses, and success in algebra is 79 strongly connected with later mathematics success. Establishing 80 an applied algebra course that integrates career and technical 81 education standards equips students with mathematical skills 82 directly connected to real industry practices and increases the 83 relevance of algebra instruction. By contextualizing algebraic 84 concepts within authentic occupational problems, such applied 85 algebra courses improve student engagement, strengthen 86 understanding of core math standards, and better prepare 87 students for high-skill, high-wage careers. Such a course will 88 enable students to pass the Algebra 1 end-of-course assessment, 89 but also develop practical skills that support success in 90 Floridaâs workforce and postsecondary pathways. 91 (2)âThe Department of Education shall develop an applied 92 algebra course for each of the established career and technical 93 education career clusters. Each applied algebra course must: 94 (a)âIntegrate the career and technical education program 95 standards and benchmarks for the relevant career cluster with 96 the Florida Standards for Algebra 1. 97 (b)âProvide students with rigorous, career-relevant 98 mathematical applications that demonstrate the use of algebraic 99 concepts in authentic industry problems, processes, or settings. 100 (c)âPrepare students to take the statewide, standardized 101 Algebra 1 end-of-course assessment required under s. 1008.22. 102 (d)âMeet all requirements for a mathematics credit required 103 for high school graduation under s. 1003.4282(3)(b) or for 104 middle grades promotion pursuant to s. 1003.4156(1)(b). 105 (3)(a)âThe department shall develop the courses on the 106 following timelines: 107 1.âApplied algebra courses in the following career clusters 108 must be developed and available for district adoption in the 109 2027-2028 school year: 110 a.âAgriculture, food, and natural resources. 111 b.âArchitecture and construction. 112 c.âBusiness management and administration. 113 d.âEnergy. 114 e.âEngineering and technology education. 115 f.âFinance. 116 g.âHealth science. 117 h.âInformation technology. 118 i.âManufacturing. 119 j.âTransportation and distribution logistics. 120 2.âApplied algebra courses in the following career clusters 121 must be developed and available for district adoption in the 122 2028-2029 school year: 123 a.âArts, AV technology, and communications. 124 b.âEducation and training. 125 c.âGovernment and public administration. 126 d.âHospitality and tourism. 127 e.âHuman services. 128 f.âLaw, public safety, and security. 129 g.âMarketing, sales, and service. 130 (b)âIn grades 6 through 12, school districts may offer one 131 or more applied algebra courses in lieu of Algebra 1, and 132 successful completion of the course will satisfy the Algebra 1 133 credit requirement for high school graduation or middle grades 134 promotion. 135 (c)âThe department shall collaborate with the Board of 136 Governors of the State University System to ensure that each 137 applied algebra course is accepted as a mathematics credit for 138 state university admissions. 139 (d)âThe department shall provide professional development, 140 instructional resources, and technical assistance to support 141 district implementation. 142 Section 3.â(1)âThe Department of Education shall 143 collaborate with the Lastinger Center for Learning at the 144 University of Florida to recommend to the Legislature an 145 individualized, adaptive artificial intelligence tool to support 146 mathematics instruction in kindergarten through grade 12. The 147 recommendations must: 148 (a)âEnsure that recommended tools align to the Florida 149 academic standards and prepare students for state assessments. 150 (b)âConsider alternate mathematics sequencing and grade 151 level progression, and alternate funding models to support 152 individualized progression through content. 153 (c)âEvaluate the extent to which tools provide real-time 154 diagnostic assessments, individualized learning pathways, 155 adaptive sequencing of content, and immediate, personalized 156 feedback to students. 157 (d)âEvaluate the applicability of the tool to progress 158 monitoring tools, district learning management systems, 159 suggested interventions, small-group instructional supports, and 160 professional development that enables teachers to integrate the 161 tools into classroom instruction. 162 (e)âProvide for student data privacy and transparency in 163 data collection and retention. 164 (f)âConsider statewide and district-level costs. 165 (2)âThe department shall submit its recommendations to the 166 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 167 House of Representatives by December 1, 2026. 168 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.